Massachusetts, session 194th, S1036.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 231 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 140D the
following section:-
Section 140E.
There shall be a rebuttable presumption of negligence by the defendant in all actions to
recover damages for injury to the person or death of the person arising from an accident or
collision with a vulnerable road user as defined in section 1 of chapter 90 involving a motor
vehicle, trailer, semi-trailer or semi-trailer unit classified as a class 3 or above by the Federal
Highway Administration, with a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,001 pounds or more, provided
the defendant failed to equip the vehicle with a lateral protective device, convex mirrors,
crossover mirrors and backup cameras.
of 1